South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3866.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-63-32(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The school district also must require an adult to: (1) complete and sign an affidavit: (1)(a) confirming the qualifications set out in Section 59-63-31(1)(c) establishing residency of the child in the school district; (2)(b) attesting that the child's claim of residency in the district is not primarily related to attendance at a particular school within the district; and (3)(c) accepting responsibility for educational decisions for the child; and (2) produce one of the following valid and current/unexpired forms of identification of the adult: (a) South Carolina driver's license; (b) other form of identification containing a photograph issued by the South Carolina Department of Motor Vehicles; (c) United States passport; (d) military identification containing a photograph issued by the United States government; or (e) South Carolina voter registration card containing a photograph of the voter pursuant to Section 7-5-675. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----